Maine, session 132, LD35.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Ambulance services reimbursement rate. Notwithstanding the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3174-JJ or any other provision of law to the contrary,
beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2028, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall reimburse for ambulance services under MaineCare at a level that is 140%
of the average allowable reimbursement rate under Medicare for such services.
Sec. 2. Transfer from Department of Public Safety, Emergency Medical
Services Stabilization and Sustainability Program, Other Special Revenue
Funds account; Department of Health and Human Services, Medical Care -
Payments to Providers. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or
before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall transfer $15,000,000 from the Department
of Public Safety, Emergency Medical Services Stabilization and Sustainability Program,
Other Special Revenue Funds account to the Department of Health and Human Services,
Medical Care - Payments to Providers program, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time allocation for a temporary change to the department's rule
Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Section 5, Ambulance Services, so
that, effective July 1, 2025, MaineCare Ambulance Services codes with Medicare
equivalents are reimbursed at 140% of the current published Medicare rates. This
temporary increase ends June 30, 2028.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,300,000 $7,300,000
Page 1 - 132LR0241(01)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,300,000 $7,300,000

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,000 $5,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,000,000 $5,000,000

HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $7,300,000 $7,300,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $5,000,000 $5,000,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $12,300,000 $12,300,000
179 PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
EMS Stabilization and Sustainability Program Z382
Initiative: Provides one-time deallocation to the Emergency Medical Services Stabilization
and Sustainability Program established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 32, section 98.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($15,000,000) $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($15,000,000) $0
2251
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($15,000,000) $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($15,000,000) $0
3226
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $7,300,000 $7,300,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($10,000,000) $5,000,000
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($2,700,000) $12,300,000
3393 Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
4304 takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR0241(01)